District of Columbia statutes.
38-1806.01

Purpose.

The purpose of this subchapter is:

(1)

To leverage private sector funds utilizing initial Federal investments in order to provide students and teachers within the District of Columbia public schools and public charter schools with access to state-of-the-art educational technology;

(2)

To establish a regional job training and employment center;

(3)

To strengthen workforce preparation initiatives for students within the District of Columbia public schools and public charter schools;

(4)

To coordinate private sector investments in carrying out this chapter; and

(5)

To assist the Superintendent with the development of individual career paths in accordance with the long-term reform plan.

History

Apr. 26, 1996, 110 Stat. 1321 [264], Pub. L. 104-134, § 2601

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-2853.61.